Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.340

Denial, revocation, suspension of licenses, probationary orders—Previous violations as grounds.

Previous violation by the applicant or licensee, or by any person connected with him or her, of any of the provisions of this chapter and/or rules and regulations adopted hereunder, shall be good and sufficient ground for denial, suspension or revocation of a license, or the issuance of a conditional or probationary order.

[ 2011 c 336 s 585; 1959 c 139 s 34.]